Hawaii statutes.
[§486-118.5] Ni‛ihau shells;
representing content. (a) For the purposes of this section,
"Ni‛ihau shells" means seashells harvested from the island of
Ni‛ihau, its waters, or its beaches.

(b) Except as provided herein, no person shall
offer, display, expose for sale, or solicit for sale any product or jewelry
item fabricated, processed, or manufactured with seashells, that is described,
labeled, or identified using the term "Ni‘ihau" or
"Niihau", either alone or in conjunction with other words, or in a
trade or brand name, unless:

(1) One hundred per cent of all shells in the product
or jewelry item are Ni‛ihau shells; and

(2) The product or jewelry item is fabricated,
processed, or manufactured entirely within this State.

(c) Any product or jewelry item that consists
of at least eighty per cent Ni‛ihau shells, by count, and that meets the
requirement of subsection (b)(2), may be described, labeled, or identified
using the term "contains", followed immediately by the nearest whole
number representing the percentage of Ni‛ihau shells, by count, contained
in the product or jewelry item, followed by the term, "% Ni‛ihau
shells" or "% Niihau shells". [L 2004, c 91, §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next